src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
ай+N+Sem/Ani:а N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..ай+N:а.." ;
аркирей+N:аркире N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..аркирей+N:аркире.." ;
туй+N:ту N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..туй+N:ту.." ;
очакыв+N:оча#кыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
пӧрисьув+N:пӧрисьул N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
гажув+N:гажул N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
англичана+N:англичана N2R1_ ;
антоновеч+N:антоновеч N2R2_ ;
башкиреч+N:башкиреч N2R2_ ;
башкырка+N:башкырка N2R1_ ;
бенедиктинеч+N:бенедиктинеч N_2R1O6 ;
бикыв+N:бикыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
бирка+N:бирка Noun1-F ;
бон+N:бон N_ ;
бродок+N:бродок N_ok ;
вадӧрчи+N:вадӧрчи N2R1_ ;
валюшка+N:валюшка N_dial ;
вахтанговеч+N:вахтанговеч N2R2_ ;
висьӧв+N:висьӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
во+N:во N_ ;
вогуличи+N:вогуличи N_2R1O6 ;
вӧлок+N:вӧлок N_ok ;
вооруженнё+N:вооруженнё N1R2_ ;
вӧр-ваиньӧй+N:вӧр-ваиньӧй N_voc ;
вятичка+N:вятичка N2R1_ ;
габровеч+N:габровеч N2R2_ ;
гайнса+N:гайнса N_2 ;
гармошечка+N:гармошечка Noun1-F ;
гона+N:гона N_dial ;
горадзуль+N:горадзуль N_ ;
даргинка+N:даргинка N2R1_ ;
денисовеч+N:денисовеч N_2R1O6 ;
джоджув+N:джоджул N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
дзержинеч+N:дзержинеч N2R2_ ;
добычаок+N:добычаок N_ok ;
догадь+N:догадь N1R2_ ;
дӧрӧм+N:дӧрӧм N_ ;
дриопитек+N:дриопитек Noun1-F ;
другиньӧй+N:другиньӧй N_voc ;
егыр+N:егыр N_dial ;
езид+N:езид N_2R1O6 ;
замечаннё+N:замечаннё N1R2_ ;
зону+N:зону N_voc ;
зюздинса+N:зюздинса N_2 ;
изок+N:изок N_ok ;
инглишмен+N:инглишмен N2R1_ ;
иньвинса+N:иньвинса N_2 ;
исландеч+N:исландеч N2R2_ ;
испытаннё+N:испытаннё N1R2_ ;
йи+N:йи N_ ;
йӧрдан+N:йӧрдан N_dial ;
йоруба+N:йоруба N_2R1O6 ;
карбас+N:карбас Noun1-F ;
картов+N:картол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
кацап+N:кацап N_2R1O6 ;
кӧдзыв+Hom1+N:кӧдзыл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
кӧз+N:кӧз N_ ;
кӧзапиянок+N:кӧзапиянок N_ok ;
койгортчи+N:койгортчи N2R1_ ;
кокна+N:кокна N_dial ;
коми-зюзьдинса+N:коми-зюзьдинса N_2 ;
корееч+N:корееч N2R2_ ;
косинса+N:косинса N_2 ;
кочёвса+N:кочёвса N_2 ;
крайиньӧй+N:крайиньӧй N_voc ;
кувинса+N:кувинса N_2 ;
кудымкарса+N:кудымкарса N_2 ;
кузнечик+N:кузнечик N1R2_ ;
курибан+N:курибан Noun1-F ;
курка+N:курка N_dial ;
курӧгварыш+N:курӧгварыш N_ ;
кучишок+N:кучишок N_ok ;
кыліньӧй+N:кыліньӧй N_voc ;
кыров+N:кырол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
латвиеч+N:латвиеч N_2R1O6 ;
ленинградса+N:ленинградса N_2 ;
литовеч+N:литовеч N2R2_ ;
лысок+N:лысок N_ok ;
ляпа+N:ляпа N_ ;
мари+N:мари N2R1_ ;
матуш+N:матуш N_voc ;
мекинича+N:мекинича N_dial ;
монархия+N:монархия Noun1-F ;
монегаска+N:монегаска N_2R1O6 ;
мырсьӧминьӧй+N:мырсьӧминьӧй N_voc ;
наблюденнё+N:наблюденнё N1R2_ ;
налимашорчи+N:налимашорчи N_2 ;
нисарт+N:нисарт N_2R1O6 ;
норвежеч+N:норвежеч N2R2_ ;
нӧрӧс+N:нӧрӧс N_ ;
обук+N:обук N_dial ;
обустройство+N:обустройство N1R2_ ;
орӧток+N:орӧток N_ok ;
орочон+N:орочон N2R1_ ;
освобожденнё+N:освобожденнё N1R2_ ;
оськӧв+N:оськӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
отдушина+N:отдушина Noun1-F ;
ошнитш+N:ошнитш N_ ;
пелысь+N:пелыч N_err/orth ;
перковса+N:перковса N_2 ;
печер+N:печер N_2R1O6 ;
плетушка+N:плетушка N_dial ;
подлиповса+N:подлиповса N_2 ;
пожумок+N:пожумок N_ok ;
полпред+N:полпред Noun1-F ;
пӧляніньӧй+N:пӧляніньӧй N_voc ;
пӧрӧс+N:пӧрӧс N_ ;
преданнё+N:преданнё N1R2_ ;
пуховчана+N:пуховчана N_2R1O6 ;
пятигорчана+N:пятигорчана N2R1_ ;
растры+N:растры Noun1-F ;
руб+N:руб N_dial ;
самодиеч+N:самодиеч N2R2_ ;
сапожок+N:сапожок N_ok ;
сведеннё+N:сведеннё N1R2_ ;
северянин+N:северянин N_2R1O6 ;
сийӧс-сермӧт+N:сийӧс-сермӧт N_ ;
снага+N:снага Noun1-F ;
сой+N:со N_END-IN-J  "(kpv)..сой+N:со.." ;
сойиньӧй+N:сойиньӧй N_voc ;
стахановка+N:стахановка N2R1_ ;
струж+N:струж N_dial ;
сугоннё+N:сугоннё N1R2_ ;
сьӧлӧмшогиньӧй+N:сьӧлӧмшогиньӧй N_voc ;
типок+N:типок N_ok ;
тӧлокиньӧй+N:тӧлокиньӧй N_voc ;
томилинеч+N:томилинеч N2R2_ ;
топиарий+N:топиарий Noun1-F ;
угов+N:угол N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
усть-чилёмчи+N:усть-чилёмчи N2R1_ ;
финно-угр+N:финно-угр N_2 ;
фламандеч+N:фламандеч N_2R1O6 ;
холмогорка+N:холмогорка Noun1-F ;
чвет+N:чвет N_ ;
черногореч+N:черногореч N2R2_ ;
чивылёк+N:чивылёк N_dial ;
чугунок+N:чугунок N_ok ;
шелетеннё+N:шелетеннё N1R2_ ;
шорокиньӧй+N:шорокиньӧй N_voc ;
шынньӧв+N:шынньӧл N_PARAGOGIC-V/L ;
эвенкийка+N:эвенкийка N2R1_ ;
юркок+N:юркок N_ok ;
ягӧдокиньӧй+N:ягӧдокиньӧй N_voc ;
яз+N:яз N_dial ;
ящур+N:ящур Noun1-F ;
